Hawaii statutes.
§351-83 Collection account, creation,
disbursements. Monetary compensation received by the commission pursuant
to section 351-82(1) shall be deposited into a collection account
established by the commission. The moneys deposited into the collection account
including interest earned shall be used exclusively to pay the expenses of
legal representation incurred by the convicted person in prosecuting an appeal
of the conviction. Upon the presentation of a verified statement of attorney's
fees and expenses, the commission shall pay such attorney's fees and expenses
reasonably and necessarily incurred in prosecuting the appeal.

If the monetary compensation deposited into the
collection account pursuant to section 351-82(1) is not sufficient to
prosecute the convicted person's appeal, or if the convicted person seeks other
judicial relief in order to void the conviction or to obtain release from
incarceration, then the convicted person may obtain a court order compelling
the commission either to pay the sum necessary for adequate legal
representation out of the funds deposited in the special account pursuant to
section 351-82(2) or to deposit into the collection account a percentage
greater than fifty per cent of the monetary compensation payable to the convicted
person. [L 1986, c 155, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next